Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3703
Club, defined.

Club shall mean any organization or other person presently or hereafter engaged in selling, furnishing, or making available to members, either as principal or agent, motor club services.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 3.